Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6039.04
Paid dining assistant registry.

The department shall maintain a paid dining assistant registry and shall include in the registry individuals who have successfully completed a paid dining assistant course of training and a competency evaluation program.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 118.